Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5013.4 of Title 74, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Oklahoma Department of Commerce to be designated the
"Oklahoma Main Street Grant Program Revolving Fund", which shall
consist of all monies appropriated, transferred, or otherwise
designated to the fund by law. The fund shall be a continuing fund,
not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall be under the
administration of the Oklahoma Department of Commerce. All monies
accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2407 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

shal l be budgeted and expended in accordance with the provisions of
subsection B of this section for the purpose of preserving and
developing Oklahoma main streets. Expenditures from the fund shall
be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. In order to be considered for a grant, a Main Street shall
apply to the Oklahoma Department of Commerce. The application shall
be on a form prescribed by the Department of Commerce and shall
contain such information as may be required by the Department of
Commerce to determine if the applicant is qualified.
C. Except as otherwise provided by this section, in order to
qualify for the grant, the Main Street applying shall be required
to:
1. Be a designated and qualified Main Street by the Oklahoma
Main Street Program; and
2. Upon receiving the grant, the Main Street shall contract
with the Department of Commerce which will require a submission of
proof that the Main Street is still a designated Main Street and an
invoice to the Department of Commerce to be paid no earlier than
June 1 of any fiscal year in which there are funds to award the
grant.
D. If an awarded Main Street is no longer a designated Main
Street, they will be removed from the grant program and shall be
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2407 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

inel igible to receive grant funds. Any funds that are available
because of the applicants that were preapproved but are no longer
designated Main Streets will be reallocated evenly to the other
qualified grant awardees.
E. No Main Street that applies for the grant will depend upon
future awarded funds for operations, but in any year awarded, funds
may go towards any cost associated with their operations.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
April 16, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB2407 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)